SEALED ORDERS
Director:
BENJAMIN CHRISTENSEN
Manuscript:
Benjamin Christensen
& Laurids Skands
Cinematography:
Emil Dinesen
Cast:
Lieutenant van Hauen... Benjamin Christensen
His wife... Karen Sandberg
Count Spinelli... Hermann Spiro
Rear-admiral van Hauen... Fritz Lampretch
Jane, the nanny... Amanda Lund
War is impending.
Liutenant van Hauen writes his will.
"Our flag is too good for that!"
Lieutenant van Hauen hands over the will to his wife.
Count Spinelli adores
Mrs. van Hauen
I rashly promised you a picture of myself, but you must not ask for more. I love my husband and my children.
BEWARE OF X AT MIDNIGHT!
...and my love for you could bring many sacrifices.
Yours
Count Spinelli
Orders for Lieutenant van Hauen:
Immediately take charge over the cruiser "Gelderland". van Hauen
Rear-admiral
The fleet of the fatherland
The fleet of the fatherland
At midnight two suspicious characters approach the old mill.
At midnight two suspicious characters approach the old mill.
"That's where the count lives!"
BEWARE OF X AT MIDNIGHT!
Your last intelligence was very valuable. Enclosed fin $10,000. Send all important information by carrier pigeon from X.
...bring you a remembrance of love -- of the lovely hours we could spend together.
Your husband might be suspicious if you do not attend the party.
Thank you for the photo.
I kiss your picture.
Spinelli
The count picks up his guests.
In the afternoon at the count's state
"When can I speak to you -- alone?"
Lieutenant van Hauen's father, rear-admiral van Hauen.
"The war has started!"
A final attempt
"We're at war! -- Long live the fatherland!"
"We're at war! -- Long live the fatherland!"
The letter!
"Can I please have a paper elephant?"
The sealed orders
The sealed orders
"The fatherland expects everyone to perform his duty!"
"Should we say evening prayer for father?"
"Here are the sealed orders"
"Here are the sealed orders"
Orders for 2nd division:
Attack at dawn
-- South -- South West. van Hauen
Rear-admiral
"We have to hurry on board!"
The coat!!
2nd division attacks at dawn
-- South -- South West!
2nd division attacks at dawn
-- South -- South West!
"My son -- a traitor!"
"Examine the sealed orders!"
The next morning
The next morning
Search of the house
"He says that my father has been arrested!"
All of a sudden she sees
Spinelli's words of love in the right light. He is a liar and a fraud. She remembers his coat.
All of a sudden she sees
Spinelli's words of love in the right light. He is a liar and a fraud. She remembers his coat.
The minutes of the hearing arrive a few days later.
The minutes of the hearing arrive a few days later.
- but also the henchmen of the count are ready -
The verdict
"Stop! My husband is innocent!"
"Count Spinelli was with me that evening.
He forgot his coat.
Maybe he is the traitor!"
"My wife is rambling
- the coat is mine!"
"Examine the coat!"
Your last intelligence was very valuable. Enclosed find $10,000. Send all important information by carrier pigeon from X.
"If the coat is yours, you must be the recipient of this letter!"
She tries to move the rear-admiral to provide count Spinelli as a witness.
She tries to move the rear-admiral to provide count Spinelli as a witness.
...among the currently missing persons is count Spinelli.
"Dear God, please let me see my father one more time."
- The elephant - that is the letter from Spinelli! - And the X - it is the wings of the mill! - The solution must be found in the old mill!
- The elephant - that is the letter from Spinelli! - And the X - it is the wings of the mill! - The solution must be found in the old mill!
The old mill is at the center of the battle.
"I am Mrs. van Hauen.
You must help me prove the innocence of my husband!"
To clear my conscience before death, I hereby confess to having opened
Lieutenant van Hauen's sealed orders.
Count Spinelli
Safe -
Safe -
"Deliver this to Mrs. van Hauen personally."
The disastrous photograph
I rashly promised you a picture of myself, but you must not ask for more. I love my husband and my children.
THE END
Restoration of this film was made possible by donations from
The Gertrude and Ivar Philipson
Foundation
Sir Arne's Treasure a winter ballad in five acts
Sets and wardrove created and supervised by Axel Esbensen
Chief engineer: Mats Lindberg
Directed by
Mauritz Stiller a production of Svensk Filmindustri
During the reign of king Johan III a bitterly cold winter swept over Sweden, the likes of which had never been seen in living memory.
The king discovered a conspiracy among his Scottish mercenary troops.
The soldiers of fortune were ordered to leave, and were kept under guard until crossing the border.
Their leaders were bold and fearless men.
They were arrested and sent to the tower.
Sir Philip...   Eric Stocklassa
Sir Donald...   Bror Berger
...and the youngest,
Sir Archie...   Richard Lund
As long as they remained within the bounds of Swedish rule, they dare not reveal their identities. They donned rough hides and claimed to be journeyman tanners, roaming the country in search of work.
...and by the time they reached the border, they were completely famished.
In those days, in Marstrand, there lived an impoverished fish hawker, a man known as Torarin. Most of his time was spent on the road selling salted and dried fish.
Torarin... Axel Nilson
"I have had great news today, Grim. The sea has frozen over.
Not only the bays and sounds -- but quite far out to sea."
"Since we will pass by the vicarage at Solberga, we could stop there and ask if the ice will bear our weight all the way to Marstrand."
Generally, the dog was still and merely blinked at his master words.
But when he heard something that displeased him, he climbed on top of the load they carried, pointed his nose skyward, and howled.
"Dear dog, what do you have against Solberga?
Have we not many times swung past the vicarage to pay visit to Sir Arne?"
At the vicarage - the state known as Solberga - the vicar, Sir Arne, ate his supper in the company of his housefolk.
The vicar was an old man who retained his dignity and vigor.
Sir Arne... Hjalmar Selander
While the years had not been kind to his wife.
The vicar's wife...   Concordia Selander
Seated on the other side of Sir Arne was the curate.
Curate...   Gösta Gustafson
At the far end of the table were Sir Arne's niece, Berghild, and her foster sister Elsalill, an orphan taken in by the vicar's household.
Elsalill...   Mary Johnson
Berghild...   Wanda Rothgardt
The only person present not belonging to the household was Torarin...
...and his gaze kept returning to the iron-clad chest at the foot of the four-poster bed. This is were Sir Arne stored a fortune in silver coins, and it was said they filled the chest to the very brim.
Though Torarin was a man of little means, he had no desire to possess this fortune, for he had heard that Sir Arne had taken the money from the large monasteries that once flourished in this country and that the old monks had prophesied that the money would bring ill-fortune.
"Why are they sharpening knives over at Branehög?"
"Tell me, why are they sharpening such long knives over at Branehög on this very night?"
"Do you not hear the scraping and filing?
Do you not hear the hissing and squealing?"
"How can you hear them sharpening knives over at Branehög?
That estate is miles away. Pray let us finish our supper.
Act II
That very evening a banquet was held at the inn at Branehög...
...and all the townspeople were invited.
"The old saying holds true:
The closest neighbor is the last to arrive."
"I'll still see them in my mind's eye -- sharpening their knives.
God only knows what they plan."
"Fortunately the lady vicar's vision was no more ominous than a few journeyman tanners preparing the tools of their trade."
Long after mignight, a few men left the inn at Branehög in order to saddle their horses and return home.
"Come out! Come out!
The vicarage is on fire!"
"Last night Sir Arne and his entire household were murdered by three men... who entered the house though the smoke-hole in the roof.. men dressed in rough hides."
"Sir Arne's horse is gone... and so is the sleigh!"
Act III
The impoverished young maid, the sole survivor of the bloodbath, was taken by Torarin to come live with him and his mother in their cottage.
Torarin's cottage was situated at the highest point of the island --
-- and all the Scottish mercenaries, mariners and fishermen, locked in by the ice at Marstrand, used to pass by his cottage on their way to see if the sea had begun to cast off its blanket of ice.
Often were the times Elsalill gazed upon those who passed by.
She would ponder how blessed they were, to have something to look forward to. She yearned for nothing on earth.
"I am not wealthy enough, Elsalill, to feed and clothe you-- so that you may remain idle and nurture your grief."
"Oh, Mother Katri! The last to be slain was my foster sister.
She pleaded for mercy, but one of the men stabbed her in the heart."
"Had I not hidden behind a wall, I would be with my dear foster sister now!"
"I hope they are alive, so I may rip their hearts from their chests!
I hope they are alive, so I may see them drawn and quartered!"
"We did not come to frighten you, good maiden, but to ask you to share your tale with us."
"We came to Marstrand to book passage to Scotland but all the fjords and sounds are frozen. Now we while away the hours, and would be much obliged if you would share your tale with us."
"Show the gentleman you do not lack the breeding to respond properly, Elsalill! You were born to a higher station and are not a lowly fish wench."
After that day, Sir Archie often ventured to Torarin's cottage to speak to Elsalill.
"God himself has sent you to me, Elsalill!"
"Elsalill, will you accompany me to Scotland ...as my wife?"
"There I will build you a castle -- of wich you will be the distinguished mistress."
"Do you see the hair entwining my hand, Elsalill?
Do you see the lock of fair hair?"
"In this very same manner the hair of my foster sister was twisted around the hand of her killer."
"We frighten ourselves, unnecessarily, Elsalill.
Look, it was but a few sunbeams shining in from the window."
"Sir Archie! Sir Archie!
Why must you call the dead to mind?"
"Leave me, leave me, Sir Archie. For now my mind dwells solely upon the dead."
"Grim, my dear dog, you can no longer doubt that we travel across the sea. Look -- a large ship is locked in the ice."
"What do you say? Shall we call to the skipper and see if he wants to buy our fish?"
If the ice does not break, it would be impossible to set sail for Scotland. Sir Archie wishes to discuss this matter with the skipper.
"A man like yourself, who travels everywhere and hears everything, do you know why God keeps the gates of the sea barred for so long...?
Holding us all captive?"
"Once I spent a whole month in Bergen, when headwinds were so strong not a single ship could put out."
The skipper...   Gustav Aronson
"You see, one of the ships stuck in the harbor was carrying a man who had stolen from the church. And he would have escaped, had it not been for the raging storm."
"As soon as he was brought ashore, the weather turned beautiful and the wind grew peaceful."
"Do you know why I asked why God keeps the gates of the sea barred?"
"He requested passage to Scotland for himself and his men, but I do not like to have such ruffians aboard my vessel."
Act IV
Not long afterwards, Elsalill had a peculiar dream.
She thought she saw her dead foster sister standing before her...
Elsalill saw that they were in a room where the proprietress of the tavern had her maid stationed to wash dishes and tankards.
Her sister seemed to beckon her to help wash.
The next day, the dream lingered and would not fade...
...and she was irresistibly drawn to the places her foster sister had taken her in the dream.
"Rather than simply standing there, you might come in and give me a hand with the dishes."
"Drink my brother!
Sir Arne's treasure is not yet gone."
She could not betray him. He was dear to her heart. She could not send him to be drawn and quartered. She could not bear to see his hands and feet seared off.
"God bless you for coming to see me tonight, Elsalill."
"Elsalill, I have not been to see you for many days, since grave thoughts plagued me. But when I happened upon you just now, my heart told me what I must to do -- to be released from my torment."
"I weep, Sir Archie, for the love I bear in my heart for you is too strong."
"Soon the sea will open and ships will be able to set sail to the country from which I come. Elsalill, won't you go with me?"
"You must go with me, Elsalill, or I will be doomed."
"Tonight I will come for you, Elsalill.
I must have your decision... tonight."
"Why are you out here weeping?
Why did you not stay in the cellar?"
"I left because I did not wish to hear the words of the evil-doers on your premises."
"I happened, however, to hear three men talking and one said,
'Drink, my brother, Sir Arne's treasure is not yet gone.'"
"If you can witness such words, it is best not to flee. You must go with me to the rightful authorities so they may seize the murderers and duly punish them."
Act V
The skipper sent word to Sir Archie and his men that they may board ship this evening. The sea has begun to open up to the west. They may even escape to Scotland before dawn.
"Go to the inn and settle things.
I must speak to Elsalill before we depart."
"Sir Reginald and Philip have gone to the inn while Sir Archie has gone to Torarin's cottage."
"Make haste and fly, the town guards are after you!"
"They are looking for the men who murdered Sir Arne."
"Did you recognize me, Elsalill, and set them upon me?"
"They are coming for you... Go!"
"Have you considered that I will no longer have a hope of ever redeeming myself?"
"Why did you do it, Sir Archie?"
"We had been driven mad by hunger and the cold.
We were senseless with drink. I did not know what I was doing."
"Why do you betray me... just when I trustred you most?"
"Do not fear me, Elsalill. I am again the man I once was.
I have returned to my senses..."
"...and no harm will befall you on this night either,
I assure you."
Using Elsalill as a shield,
Sir Archie ran for the door.
A wild wolf of the woods she had loved.
An evil murderer she shielded with her own body.
And as Sir Archie took another step, the pike plunged into Elsalill's heart.
All night long the skipper paced the deck of his ketch...
Who could know what possessed the skipper to be out on such a night as this. His crew was safely aboard ship, and so were the passengers destined for Scotland.
It was not until dawn's early light that the skipper saw the sight he was longing for.
Fjords and sounds were now open far out to sea.
But the inlet where his ship was iced in showed no channels -- it was frozen solid.
"I implore you to help me find the maid whom the Scotsmen brought to your ship last night..."
"Last night she was abducted by the men who killed
Sir Arne and they brought her to your ship."
"The town guard will not venture out this far.
Not to a ship carrying a hundred soldiers of fortune.
They are unwilling to engage them in battle..."
"Now I know why we have been held back... while all other ships may put to sea. It is because we have evildoers on board."
"Stay calm and obey that man.
This is the will of God."
As soon as the criminals were brought to shore, the storm began to rage again.
And from his lofty vantage point of deck, the skipper saw a lengthy procession approach his skip.
It was the womenfolk of Marstrand, both young and old.
They were clad in mourning, and youn men carried a bier.
They had come to collect the young maiden who had loved an evildoer... and had given her life to destroy him.
...and in their wake, the tempest tore up the ice over wich they had but lately passed.
By the time they reached Marstrand with Elsalill, the gates of the sea stood open.
The end
The musical score for Sir Arne's Treasure is the result of a collaboration between the
Swedish Film Institute and Swedish Filmindustry
The score was co-written by Matti Bye and Fredrik Emilson
Instrumentatilst:
Sir Arne's Treasure was restored by the
Swedish Film Institute Archive in 2000.
The original tints were recreated and footage discovered in London and Copenhagen has been restored.
Subtitles: Ingrid Eng-Rundlow
The Abyss
Producer: Hjalmar Davidsen
Screenplay and Direction: Urban Gad
Cinematography: Alfred Lind
Young hearts.
Duty calls.
A welcome invitation
Dear Miss Vang:
It would please my parents and myself very much, if you... would like to spend your summer vacation here at the vicarage. Tell me which day and train you will... be arriving on, and I'll pick you up at the station. Kind regards,
Knud Svane.
Summer vacation.
A sunday at the vicarage.
The travelling circus.
...in the field behind the inn.
Performances by all artists.
Special atraction! Never seen before!
Mr. Rudolph.
Cowboy and Wrangler.
The tightrope dancer. Miss Evelyn...
A fatal promise.
First time in Gjerlev!
Circus Fortuna.
Tonight amazing Galla performance... in the large tent in the field behind the inn. Performances by all artists.
After the show.
Longing and desire....
I could not stay any longer.
I have escaped with the man I love.
Never think about marrying me, but forgive me. Magda.
Some time later in Copenhagen.
In the artists' hotel.
A coincidence.
A forced dance rehersal.
Destiny decided.
The scandal.
Downhill
A recognition.
Dear Miss: A friend would like to talk with you
The bill must be paid.
The one who must earn the money.
A wasted life.
The End.
In 2004 a tinted nitrate print of Terje Vigen was rediscovered.
From this print a black and white duplicate negative was made in 2005.
The film's original intertitles were inserted into the new negative, -
- and the colours were recreated by the Desmet tinting method.
Act One.
There lived a remarkably grizzled man on the uttermost, barren isIe;
He never harmed, in the wide world's span, -
- a soul by deceit or guiIe;
His eyes, though, sometimes would blaze and fret -
- most when the storm was nigh, -
And now, all I've heard about Terje I'll try -
- to tell from the first to last.
With land underfoot he was never at ease; -
- no, better by far then to dwell on the seas, -
- on the mighty ebb and the flow.
In autumn, when wild-geese were singing south, -
- he met with their flying skein.
A heaviness fell on the sailor's breast;
Life lay astern with fire and zest, and ahead lay a winter's gloom.
They anchored, and off his crewmen went -
- with leave for a wild carouse.
He watched them with envy and discontent -
- while he stood by his silent house.
Indoors there were two bestowed;
His wife sat and span in the peaceful light, -
- but the crib held a rosy, healthy mite, -
- a baby girl, and it crowed.
That instant, and Terje's mind, men say, turned sober upon the spot.
He would sing all his happiest ditties there, -
- where little Anna tugged his brown hair -
- and lay in his folding arm.
Life ambled along till the year of war -
- in eighteen-hundred and nine.
The tale's still told of what people bore, -
- where want and distress combine.
Cruisers from England blockaded each port, -
- by land there was dearth far and wide;
The poor people starved, the wealthy went short, two powerful arms were no longer support -
- with death and disease outside,
Then Terje drooped for a day or two
But his miseries quickly go; he thought of a comrade, ancient and true: -
- the sea's great ebb and its flow.
The smallest dory there was to hand he chose for his Skagen trip.
Sail and mast he left home on land, such gear he thought best not ship.
''When winds stopped blustering quite so wild, -
- Terje Vigen rowed for his wife and child -
- crossed the sea in an open boat!''
The Jutland reef was the devil to clear, -
- but worse, he'd the English blockade to fear -
- its look-out's eagle-eyed gleam.
To be continued.
Act Two.
At Fladstrand, reaching there safe and sound, -
- he gathered his precious stores.
Here was the staff of life to hand; -
- and his wife and baby call.
The fourth morning, at dawn, by sun's first rays, -
- a blurred, misty line to scan.
Near home at last; -
That instant the word froze on his lip;
Gæsling's the shoal with hidden top just east of the Homborg sound;
The English officer shouted ''stop!''
He hoisted an oarbutt, let it drop, and stove in the dory's shell.
''There on the innermost beach ashore watches my wife at our pitiful door -
- and waits with our baby for bread!''
He dived and he swam and he dived yet again;
In two feet depth all that treasure sank.
They lifted him out and over the side
He offered his sorrow, they sold him their glee
Then Terje fell silent, all hope was past, -
- he locked up his grief in his soul.
He languished in prison for many a day, -
- for all of five years, say some
His shoulders rounded, his hair it turned grey -
- from dreaming about his home.
Then eighteen-fourteen came and with it accord;
A Swedish frigate brought home onboard -
- Norway's prisoners, and Terje too.
Back at the jetty he came ashore a pilot by King's decree;
But few recalled in the greybeard they saw, -
- the youngster who braved the sea.
His house was a stranger's; -
- and how they fared those two, inside he soon found:
''The husband forsook them, and nobody cared, -
- they came to the plot that the paupers shared, -
- in the parish burial-ground.''
To be continued.
Act Three.
Years went by, and he kept to his trade -
- as pilot out there on the isle
His eyes, though, sometimes would blaze and fret, -
- when the reef to the breakers ran high,
And then people sensed he was troubled yet, -
- and then there were few who felt no threat -
- with Terje Vigen by.
One moonlit night, with onshore wind, -
- there was a stir where the pilots sit
An English yacht being carried in with mainsail torn and jib split.
Close-reached to the weather, a cutter sped
Like a hero he seized on the wheel;
''Preserve us alive from the breakers' roar, -
- l'll make you as wealthy as wretched before.''
The pilot let go of the craft.
His cheeks they went white, and his mouth shaped a sound, -
- like a smile that at last can break free.
The yacht was broached and ran squarely aground, -
- his lordship's queen of the sea.
''Abandon the ship!
To the boats, I say!''
''My lord and my lady, stay near!''
To Ieeward he glanced at Gæslingen's top, -
- and to windward at Hesnes' swell.
He let go helm and the foresail strop, -
- he hoisted an oarbutt and let it drop, -
- and stove in the cutter's shell!
''Anna, my child!'' she cried out in dread
To be continued.
Act Four.
They grounded and sank, but calmness itself -
- inshore of the arc of rough seas
''. . .There's no cause for grief!''
''A sunken dory supplies our relief, three barleygrain casks our dock.''
He knew, now, the sailor that on his knee -
- had crouched on his deck and wept!
''You sailed at ease in your mighty corvette, -
- I rowed in my humble boat.''
''I toiled for my own in my forehead's sweat, -
- you robbed them of bread, and could mock me yet -
- and over my salt tears gloat.''
''It's time for my vengeance to strike, beware!''
''Stand back there, my lord!
One step if you dare, -
- and your wife and child is the price!''
But Terje's forehead showed peaceful and fair.
''And now Terje Vigen's himself again.''
''Like a rocky stream flowed my blood till then; -
- for I had to - I had to repay!''
''The years I spent in the prison's roar, -
- they bred my heart's sickliness.''
''But now it's over; we two are even.''
When daylight had broken, then all was well; -
- long lay the yacht in port.
One day milord and lady came by.
''No, rescue came in the nick out there -
- from this little mite by me.''
The yacht then headed for Hesnes-sound, -
- with Norway's own flag for wear.
He lay to the sun and the winds' keen weight, -
- and that's why the grass was so stubborn-straight, -
- but with wild field-flowers between.
THE END
Original English translation prepared by Christopher Oscarson for the Pacific Film Archive,
Berkeley, California
'Be Silent, My Sorrow, Be Silent' (1918) is one of the most representative pictures of the Russian revolutionary cinema.
Its contents are poor and paltry...
Love, money, tuxedoes, "good manners".  They all are distinctive examples of cinema usage to present "delights" of bourgeois lifestyle as an ideal for every man.
The contents are so sincere, that they don't even conceal the moral turpitude of the main attitude.
Woman's beauty, and love, everything can be bought and everything can be sold.
Be Silent, My Sorrow, Be Silent
Director: P. I. Chardynyn
Lead actors: Vera Kholodnaya, V. Maksimov, O. Runich, A. Polonsiy
Part 1
The Dance "Pierretta"
- Let me go, I have to go to my husband.
- Go then. He is celebrating his benefit performance. Remember what I said? You'll go down with him.
Don't drink, Lorio, you have a difficult piece today.
I'm sorry. I won't anymore.  I'll be ready soon.
Dump him and come with me.  With my talent and your beauty...
We'll conquer the world.
No! That would be terrible.
Stop it! I have to work now.
Flirting again. I'll kill you!
Go, you fool! Only because of her.  Be silent, my sorrow, be silent.
What a hell of boring day!  What on earth can we do?
What if we go to the circus today?
Oh, I told you, told you!
So?  He will definitely survive... but will be crippled for the rest of his life.
You? ! Why? !
Here! It's what the comrades have collected for Lorio.
- What will you do now?
- The doctor said he can work no more.
Leave him. I'll create a career for you, you couldn't possibly have dreamed of.
Pola, you wouldn't leave me?
I'll get better... We'll start working together.
"The Fairytale of Dear Love"
Wake up, Pola, it is time
Be silent my sorrow, be silent!
Be silent, my sorrow, be silent!
But you've really been affected by this songstress.
No it's not that... I've got an idea:
Why don't we invite her to our bachelor party.
What a splendid idea!
Come in, the master is asking for you.
Tomorrow I'm having a party and I suggest you take part in it.
Of course, you will be handsomely rewarded.
You'll come, won't you?
So, I'll be waiting for you at eight tomorrow evening.
And this is a down payment.
No, I definitely can't go.  I have nothing to wear.
Why don't you wear a costume, you used to wear at the circus?
The party.
Would you permit me to try this on you?
This necklace fit's Mademoiselle so well, that if I were you I wouldn't look for another neck.
Mademoiselle, this necklace is yours.
In deals such as this, the intermediary receives his brokerage.
I'm still waiting.
In cinema, scenes of this kind usually end up with a diaphragm.
We'd be delighted if you would sing something for us.
I hope that after dinner you will sing some more.
But now, everybody to the table.
Now I remember where I saw you:
Didn't you use to work at the circus?
- Did you seen me there?
- Yes, I did,
At that ill-fated performance, where your partner collapsed.
Pola, just say one word and everything before you will be yours.
Stop it. You're drunk enough already!
Drunk, me?  But then again, I am drunk, really...
Let's say our goodbyes and go home.
Here, the master has asked me to deliver this.
Thank your master for me.
Fool!
She is angry.
Stop it... I'm tired of this!
Tired! but what can we do?  We have to go out today.
Go where? Reeling around courtyards?
Enough! I will not go anymore!  Do you understand? I will not!
Alright. Then I will go alone. Even alone I will earn something.
What do you think?
Yes, this is the only way out.
Sell this and end everything!...
Be silent, my sorrow, be silent.
- Someone is asking for you?
- Who is it?
That songstress.
Stay with me and you will have everything.
- A letter from the lady.
- What lady?
You'll find out.
I won't return to you. Why?  You must understand yourself.
I want to protect the memories we shared.
Send the costume I played in and the guitar.
The money is for you.  Goodbye.
And if you can... Forgive me.
Answer? Here!  Give the money to the lady.
Those things.  There, take them!
Don't you dare! D'you hear me.  I won't let you take this.
Give me a cigarette.
You'll be punished if the master finds out.
You've lost?  Tell me the truth.
I'll bail you out, but remember.  This is the last time.
- Don't you think it's too much?
- But, this is the latest trend.
- You might as well be naked.
- What do you mean?
Just look at yourself.
Hurry up, I have a music class at twelve.
What shall we do this evening?
- Nothing! We'll stay at home.
- Home? But that's so boring.
But I would have liked so much to ride in a carriage to the gypsies.
I think you'd rather move to the public house completely.
I said you were just a beautiful mannequin for him.
You are just for show.  He has no interest in your soul.
Stop!  I'm going to sing myself.
Do you think I brought you here as entertainment for these respectable people?
Clearly, one can't get the manners of a street songstress out of you!
Stay calm, I'll bring him back.
I know you fancy her, but
I can't bear to see Pola passed around like this.
Bear... Pola polar bear, d'you get it?
Repeat what was just said?
- Why should I.
- Passed around?
Then neither of you want me!
Oh, you're still here?  And you still love me...
Ready to take me, then pass me on...
To you, I'm just an animal. Like a polar bear.
Pola, I love you madly!
Very touching.  Love and romance.
64,000. Is that alright?
I beg your pardon! I didn't expect!  Tomorrow I'll deliver the money.
Next morning!
I have an urgent matter to discuss with you.
Soon I'll honour the cheque, meanwhile, please don't present it to the bank.
Listen, Zarnitskiy, it's silly to quarrel over a woman.
I'm having a small party tonight!
Prove that you stand above prejudice and come over tonight with Pola.
Pola, can you do me a big favour?
You see; Teliepniev invited us both to come to his party tonight.
You still want me to go, 
After everything that's happened?
It's a matter of life and death for me!
What are you pushing me into?
At Tielepniev's.
In remembrance of your visit, allow me to present you with this small trinket, which I've prepared for you.
We've asked Pola to sing.  Help us to convince her.
Pola, I'm begging you.  Do this for me.
This is necessary!  Do you understand, necessary!
Gentlemen, Pola is going to sing.
Hey!  Someone's fooling around in there!
THE END
MADAME BUTTERFLY after the world famous opera in 6 acts.
Characters:
Tokuyawa, the daimyo
O-Take-San, his daughter
The Bonze
Karan, the temple servant
Karan, the temple servant
Kin-be-Araki, the teahouse keeper
Hanake, O-take-San's servant girl
Olaf J. Anderson
Eva
Tokuyawa, the Daimyo travels from Europe back to Japan.
O-Take-San, his daughter
"Father, I am so happy that You have returned ---- during Your absence I had to suffer so much from the Bonze!"
"O-Take-San, your father has brought this for you from the foreign lands."
The Bonze.
Karan, the temple servant.
"Noble Lord, Your servant is guarding the Holy Shrine from the trampling of foreign feet!"
"May Buddha bless Your return!"
"You have taken many foreign things to Lippon again."
"I noticed from the gifts for Your daughter."
Olaf J. Anderson.
...So, in a couple of days
O-Take-San will become priestess in the 'Holy Forest'...
"If my child wants to -
I shall not force her!"
"You have lost your faith in Buddha in those foreign lands!
Fear his wrath!"
"That awful Bonze persecutes me, because
I have perceived his unclean purposes... but I will pray to Buddha myself... and Buddha will hear O-Take-San!"
"Forgive Your poor servant, who is not worthy to be Buddha's priestess... but who wants to sacrifice to the Noble One her greatest and dearest treasures: her puppets."
"Buddha will make sure that You are punished."
Three weeks later the festival of the 'Falling Leaves' is celebrated.
'May Buddha bless you!
The Mikade, his name be praised.
Thanks You for Your message about the traitorous Daimyo, who, with foreign doctrines wants to incite the people against the sanctified person of the Mikado.
The rebellious one will not escape his punishment...'
"An envoy from the Mikado awaits You, master!"
"The noble Mikado sends You this gift...
You know what it means... within 24 hours You must bid life farewell!"
"A gift from our merciful Lord, the Mikado. A sign of his mercy!"
"Go into the garden, for our guests are missing You!"
"O-Take-San has something to tell You!"
"The Daimyo is dead!"
"As final sign of his devotion to the Mikado, he gave him his life."
"That is the palace of Daimyo Tokuyawa, he is a favorite of the Mikado and his house is one of the most hospitable in Japan."
"Your father was punished for your sins by Buddha. Don't change your mind,
Buddha is strict, so serve him as priestess."
"Behind this wall lies the 'Holy forest', where no European may enter!"
"Prepare yourself for it, O-Take-San, in a couple of days your initiation as priestess will take place."
"How did You get here, stranger?
Don't you know our strict laws?"
"If You don't want to fall into the hands of guards
You should leave quickly!"
"Come tomorrow at the same hour..."
"O-Take-San would be a very good Geisha for the keeper of the Teahouse."
"....a normal garden...."
"I cannot follow You, for soon I will be consecrated as Buddha's priestess."
"...in the evening".
"Come quickly, O-Take-San,
I want free you, but promise me you will be quit!"
"Olaf, you changed a lot.
Come with us to the Teahouse!"
"A new geisha!"
"If you pay well, I will bring you the most beautiful geisha in Nagasaki."
"Noble chief, You can only keep this geisha if, according to the laws of the Yoshiwara, you marry her for 999 days.
You have, however, the right to divorce her, whenever you want."
"I am willing."
The next morning.
"Karan!"
"Where is O-Take-San?"
"Bring me O-Take-San, or I.."
Some time later.
"I can't approve the marriage of
Olaf Anderson with that Japanese girl, for it won't be long before we return home!"
"Holy Priest, after much effort
I've found O-Take-San.
She is married to a foreign marine officer and lives in the Teahouse on the hill."
"Be cursed, an unfaithful one."
The weeks later.
"I went to collect my inheritance..."
"This illustrates the three virtues of Japanese girls! They may hear nothing, speak nothing and see nothing."
"This is the sword with which my father killed himself, by order of the Mikado!"
"You shouldn't put so much faith in your happiness, O-Take-San... it could change quickly!"
"Olaf will never leave me..!"
"My dear Olaf, it is not nice of you, to make your little wife sad."
"That little O-Take-San seems to really love you!"
...and when the Honeymoon was over...
"Greetings O-Take-San, don't be sad...
I am travelling back to Europe, but...
I will return!"
"Come back swiftly Olaf...
You do know... that you... must come back!"
The memories of the land where the peaches grow.
...some little geisha somewhere...
"Little Olav, repeat after me:	
Great Buddha, grant me my wish and make
O-Take-San happy again!"
Lord Matahari.
"In four weeks it will be four years ago, that O-Take-San's husband left her.
According to our laws, she will be free again then, and must return to the Yoshiwara!"
"...and if she has no money to buy herself free!"...
"I want to know immediately where O-Take-San lives!"
Dear Olaf!
You probably still remember that little geisha, who you married years ago.
The poor creature has taken the affair very seriously, and has been waiting all these years with her child in tender longing for you...
"O-Take-San lives with the keeper of the Teahouse, Kin-Be-Araki!"
"The Bonze wants you to ask her for the rent for the room... if O-Take-San cannot pay... she must remain in your Teahouse!"
"That stranger paid for three years, O-Take-San has been living here with me for four years now and if does not pay the rent, she must leave this house immediately."
"I have nothing, but my husband,
Olaf Jens Anderson, will be back soon, and then you will certainly get the money!"
"In my department I will not allow the oppression of the poor!"
"You won't be bothered by that Landlord again, take this money!"
"O-Take-San is beautiful... and I don't want her to lack anything!"
"Today I got the order to set sail for Japan. Would you like to come along?"
...and when the peach trees were in bloom again...
"O-Take-San, an emissary from Lord Matahari awaits you!"
"I love you, O-Take-San, and if you want..."
"O-Take-San, would be my wife?"
"I do not want your wealth.
I am the wife of Olaf Anderson.
I'd rather die than be unfaithful to him!"
"You are mistaken, O-Take-San...
Olaf Anderson is not your husband and your mariage..."
"I won't have you insult my husband, he'll return soon to me and his child!"
"A European ship has entered the harbor...
I can feel that... it's Olaf!"
"Come, Hanake, let us decorate the house with flowers for the reception!"
After a night of waiting awake in vain...
"I'm going to the consulate to ask for him!"
"O-Take-San's time is up. She must go back to the Yoshiwara. The child will be entrusted to the State."
"Master, help! They want to steal O-Take-San's child!"
"Olaf Anderson, help for godsake!
They are trying to steal your child!"
"...now that she is free again, she must return to the 'Holy Forest'!"
"Go away! You weren't concerned
 about Buddha's sacred service.
You just wanted to have your revenge!"
"My gratitude for your protection, Lord. 
But I cannot become your wife...
I am the wife of Olaf Anderson!"
"Come, it is at least your duty to help that poor O-Take-San!"
"He is coming, O-Take-San!
He is coming!"
"Why doesn't he come himself...
I know... he has forgotten me... it was Your will!"
"He can come collect the child himself, tell him that!"
"Go inside and get your child!"
"It's better to die with honour than to live in shame!"
"Where is O-Take-San?"
"O-Take-San is dead!"
THE END
Translated by NdhW, timing by sahua.
English titles based on the Czech original
(the Italian titles are reconstructions).
The Last Days of Pompeii.
A Dead city... All of its life, the joys and the pains of its citizens...
...who were struck by death in the excitement of their entertainment,
...with flowers in their hair, the gentle beauty of its women, the bold strength of its men,
...the innocent smiles of its children, safe in the arms of their mothers,
...the wisdom of its elders coming from antiquity.
All this has been buried for 1843 years.
A lonely pilgrim, wandering about the open grave of this dead city
...brings the city back to life in his mind.
He sees crowds of people flowing in the streets,
...and through those crowds flow the noble figures of patricians,
...he sees the temples of the Roman gods, filled with crowds of kneeling devotees,
...in the arena of the overflowing amphitheater filled with cheering crowds
... he sees the first Christians finding death for the faith in one God.
And in the shadow of a reservoir, he sees...
...a woman and a man, in loving embrace, forever the same...
May his dreaming be dedicated to the memory of the lovers in this dead city!
Ione, or the last days of Pompeii
Nydia, the blind dancer
Glaucus, the champion.
Ione
Julia
Arbaces, high priest of Isis
Prologue - Nydia (new subtitle)
A feast in the house of Arbaces.
Arbaces sends for Nydia to dance on the celebration.
Nydia, the poor dancer, has not sold any flowers so far.
"My master Arbaces sends me to bring Nydia, the blind dancer."
Nydia is preparing to dance.
The young people of
Pompeii are having fun.
Julia, a noble lady of Pompeii, is passionately in love with Glaucus.
"I am not interested in Julia. I love Ione."
"He wanted to make me a part of festivities, that’s why I ran away."
In order to free Nydia, Glaucus buys the slave and thus saves her.
"In my house nobody is allowed to hurt you."
The birthday of a noble lady of Pompeii.
Chariot races.
A rival hiding in the shadow.
Arbaces, consumed by passion, tries to ensnare Ione.
"Expect me at your house, I will tell you an important secret."
"Glaucus is not worthy of your love, because he loves the slave girl he bought from Barbius."
"Come visit me tomorrow, and I will teach you to read in the book of the future."
A confession of love.
"You have a slave girl that you love in your house."
"I love you immensely, and to prove my love, I'll give my slave Nydia to you."
Glaucus gives Nydia to Ione, and asks her to sing for her new owner.
"Do you love Glaucus?"
"Yes, I love him as my friend and saviour."
"Follow me, Nydia, I have to go to the house of Arbaces."
Arbaces orders his slaves to get rid of Nydia.
In the temple of destiny.
Nydia fears the worst for Ione.
"Beautiful Ione, no one can hear you here, except for my slaves."
"I won't leave her in the hands of this monster; it would be the death of Glaucus."
"Ione is in the hands of Arbaces, come, before it is too late."
"I love you, your hesitation is futile."
Glaucus tells Nydia that he is engaged to Ione.
Julia cannot forget, because she still loves Glaucus.
"Nydia, come to me,
I have to talk to you."
Nydia tells Julia about the engagement of Glaucus and Ione.
"Nydia, come again tomorrow, and tell me what is happening in the house of Glaucus."
Julia asks Arbaces to give her a magic potion to restore Glaucus’s love to her.
"A witch who can make a love potion lives at the foot of Vesuvius ."
"A woman will come to you to ask for a love potion,
Instead, prepare a potion that will lead him to insanity and death."
Dear friend, We know that tomorrow you celebrate your wedding to the beautiful Ione.
So we invite you to dinner and we shall celebrate your last day of freedom. Julia.
Pour this philter in the glass of the man you love and you'll get what your heart desires (new subtitle).
"This magic potion will surely ignite
Glaucus’s unknown affections for me."
"Glaucus is visiting me tomorrow, so stay and sing for us."
To get the love of Glaucus, Nydia steals the presumed love potion.
Nydia, who secretly loves Glaucus, gives him the love philter.
A potion of madness.
The temple of Isis, in the garden.
Arbaces stabs the priest Meneker and turns the suspicion to Glaucus.
Arbaces's triumph.
"If you stay quiet, I will give you plenty of gold. Come to my house tomorrow."
Nydia does not know she is a victim of the crime.
"Glaucus is arrested and accused of murder."
To save Glaucus, Nydia admits her crime to Arbaces.
Nydia uses a trick to escape from the guards.
"In my cellar there is plenty of gold, what you can carry is yours."
"Promise you will turn Arbaces in for the crime he committed, and I will set you free."
Glaucus is sentenced to death. Tomorrow he will fight wild beasts in the arena.
They lead poor Glaucus to the arena to leave him at the mercy of lions.
"Confess your crime and you'll be saved, otherwise you'll die in the arena by the wild beasts."
Sallust is saddened by the loss of his friend Glaucus, and seeks comfort in wine.
Arbaces committed the murder.
I am imprisoned in his house, together with a witness of his crime.
Set both of us free, before it is too late. Nydia
"Bring this sheet to Sallust, and I will give you my jewels."
"Swear you will give him this letter."
With lot of noise, the people are heading to the arena.
Arbaces committed the murder.
I am imprisoned in his house, together with a witness of his crime.
Set both of us free, before it is too late. Nydia
The spectacle in the arena.
"We have to free the witness too."
The fight of the gladiators.
Vesuvius is awakening.
Arbaces wants to see
Glaucus's death, then Ione's.
"Glaucus is innocent,
Arbaces committed the crime."
"Throw Arbaces amongst the beasts!"
In the year 79 AD, Vesuvius awakened, and buried the city of Pompeii.
"I, a blind girl, will certainly find my way to the sea."
But poor Nydia has not forgotten her secret love yet.
The splash of a dark fall sounds in the silent night. The sea returns nothing but the cane of the poor girl.
Ten years later. A memorial statue of noble Nydia is a silent witness of Ione and Glaucus's happy life.
THE END
This movie was filmed in Castle
Belvedere in Prague, Palazzo Furstenberg,...
...in Lobkowitz and in other historical places.
"I'm not God, I can't be the devil either, but with disregard,...
...I say your name! Because wherever you are, I'll be there too...
...till your last hour, in front of your tombstone, I'll sit on your tomb!"
The students of Prague... are living the sweet life!
"What's the problem,
Balduin?"
"To the best swordsman of Prague and to the boldest student!"
Scapinelli was popular among students, because of his way of acting, without scruples.
"I'm ruined! I'd like to find some money...
...or a rich heiress!"
"Then I think that the best swordsman in Prague, and the most active student should get a chance!"
The envious Lyduschka knows about old Scarpinelli's swindle, and she's worried for Balduin.
Preparations for hunting, at Count Schwartzenberg's castle.
Countess Margit and her cousin,
Baron Waldis-Schwartzenberg, lose their way.
"Margit, why do we keep postponing our marriage?
You know that your father's desire is to see our families united.
"Dear cousin, I will obey my father's desire, but I don't love you."
"Look! The horse is heading to the lake!"
"Take this locket with my picture inside, as a souvenir of me."
"I will be eternally grateful to you, for saving my daughter's life."
The day after...
"I may be known as Balduin, the best swordsman, but...
...my real enemy, is my mirrored image."
Balduin decides to go to see the Countess.
"Am I allowed to ask how the Countess feels?"
"Mr. Balduin, allow me to introduce to you
Baron Waldis-Schwartzenberg...
...my daughter's future husband."
Balduin, who is only a poor student, takes his leave.
"Dismissed with a thank you...
She, a rich heiress and me...
...nothing but a poor student."
"How did you come in?"
"...through the door!"
"Then, Mr. Student... you won't be just the best swordsman...
...and the wildest student, but also..."
"...the richest!"
"At what price?"
I declare I received 100,000 golden coins, in exchange...
...I give to Mr. Scarpinellii, the right to take whatever he wants...
...from this room. Balduin
Prague, 13th May 1820
"What a strange guy you are!
Something from this hovel!
Take whatever you want!"
I declare I received 100,000 golden coins, in exchange...
...I grant Scapinelli the right to take whatever he wants...
...from this room. Balduin
Prague, 13th May 1820
"You may choose whatever you want!"
"Mr. Student Balduin... I want your image reflected by this mirror.
This is my secret."
"What did you say?
My image?"
"All right... a pact is a pact!"
A new life starts for Balduin...
"I'll be away because of an invitation from the governor"
"Dear Countess, may I...?"
"Finally fate allows us to be alone for a while."
"Margit... I love you!"
"I can't."
Lyduschka follows the couple.
"Goodbye, Mr. Balduin."
"Am I awake or am I dreaming?
Who are you?"
"Do you have problems, my friend?
You turned pale, aren't you feeling well?"
"See... Take a look at your image in the mirror."
"My dear cousin, don't forget you are my fiancée."
Balduin is waiting for the Count's coach...
The Countess, in her room...
"Yes, Balduin, my heart belongs to you!"
Dear Countess, please keep the promise you made,...
...to meet me tomorrow evening at 11, at the usual place.
Lyduschka is searching for the Countess...
Countess Margit goes to her meeting.
"Wait! If you'll go to your meeting, you'll be in serious danger!"
"What does this gypsy want from me?"
Margit tries to be strong, while traveling to the "Sacred Font".
Margit, recalling the gypsy's words, makes the sign of the cross.
"Why did you choose this place?"
"My dear Countess, because of the tranquillity, the peace, the solitude..."
"Who are you?"
"Baron... I think the Countess lost her handkerchief..."
"Do you dare to doubt my fiancée...?"
Balduin, still dazed because of what happened, comes back home...
"Why do you come here, Baron?"
"I don't want to discuss it.
You dishonored my family...
...I'm at your disposal."
Balduin's godfathers talk with the Baron and organize the duel...
"Baron, did you choose... sword or gun?"
"What? Sword? This Balduin is Prague's best swordsman!"
"Why are you here, Count?"
"Give me your word, say that you won't kill the Baron.
He's my sister's only son my daughter's future husband, my heir, and the last one to bear our family's name."
"You have my word, Count."
Balduin goes to the duel...
"Where are you going?"
The promise he made to the Count is broken by his other himself.
Balduin tries to explain the death of the Baron...
"The Baron's family has nothing to say to Mr. Balduin!"
Balduin tries to forget his loved one.
"I want your love, not your money!"
"Do you want to play cards with me?"
"What's the stake?"
"One of us!"
And wherever I will rest, and wherever I will die, there will always be someone behind me, a strange man, dressed in black, as a brother.
"I have to see her again! I have to talk to her and try to explain!"
"Countess, it wasn't my fault!"
Don't hate me!"
"Balduin, where's your image?"
"You can say what you want, who gave you the right to persecute me?"
"I'm not God, I can't be the devil either, but with disregard...
...I say your name!
Because wherever you are I'll be there too...
Balduin runs away, as if the devil was following him...
"He's still following me!"
"Scapinelli, take your money back!"
"I still feel his presence!"
"I'll get rid of you, once and for all...
I'll kill you with my gun!"
"I'm safe!"
"Blood... I'm injured!"
I declare I received 100.000 golden coins, and in exchange...
...I give to Mr. Scarpinelli the right to take whatever he wants...
...from this room. Balduin
Prague, 13th May 1820
"I'm not God, I can't be the devil either, but with disregard...
...I say your name!
Because wherever you are I'll be there...
...till your last hour, in front of your tombstone, I'll sit on your tomb!"
Here lies Balduin.
Downloaded From www.AllSubs.org
To preserve the coherence of the story, a missing sequence was replaced by an extracted sequence of another film of
"Fantômas" series.
This sequence, diverted from the original, is pointed out by: *
Fantômas IV
Fantômas vs Fantômas
From the novel
"The gangster policeman" by
Monsieur Navarre in the role of Fantômas
Part One:
Fantômas and public opinion.
Following the repeated failure of Inspector Juve in dealing with Fantômas, a violent press campaign erupted, which infuriated Jerome
Fandor, reporter for
'The Capital', and friend and collaborator of the policeman.
JUVE IS Fantômas!
If the police haven't managed to arrest the criminal yet, it's only because they are one and the same person.
THE PROOF:
Summoned to the Halls of
Justice, in the office of the civic judge, Juve finds himself under accusations.
The Chief Public
Prosecutor...
- Arrest this man!
- Take down a statement for the papers.
At 'The Capital', Fandor had his own network of informers who were often quicker than official statements and agency dispatches.
Commissioner, I know that someone will come to arrest me like my friend Juve.
Forgive me for giving you the slip.
While Juve is at the Station, it is better that I am free to work on his behalf to see that justice is done as soon as possible.
- Jerome Fandor
- For the commissioner when he comes to arrest me.
Part Two:
The Wall that bleeds.
Owner of several buildings in the residential part of Paris, a usurer, a crooked but careful businessman, father Moche always pays his bills on time.
-I've got another bill to collect at Monsieur
Paulet's, on the floor above.
Monsieur Paulet...
Monsieur, I present to you to the new tenant on the fifth floor of your building on Evangile Street.
This person desires that one room of her apartment be divided in two by a partition.
-Your concierge, Madame
Doullenque.
So, that man upstairs, what are you going to do with him?
- Split the money three ways and I will take care of everything.
The police prove incapable of finding the least trace of the missing bank messenger. Furious, the chief of police summoned his inspectors.
The famous american detective
Tom Bob is in Paris.
A challenger to the french police.
He intends to find out the truth about Fantômas.
Perhaps he will find a lead on the bank messenger who mysteriously disappeared several days ago and is believed to have been murdered.
- For heaven's sake, gentlemen, you are not going to let yourselves be shown up by an american!
At the tenant's home on
Evangile Street, the works were now almost finished.
-I am the new man. The boss sent me to replace you.
-It's blood!
Call the police!
A quarter of an hour later...
-The missing bank messenger!
TOM BOB, American Detective
Hotel Terminus, Paris.
Part Three:
Fantômas vs
Fantômas.
By her new marriage,
Lady Beltham, Fantômas's old mistress, had become the grand duchess Alexandra.
She believed she had finally broken off from the past.
- Fantômas!
- I've only one last service to ask of you... our Highness.
To: The Havas Agency.
Since the police are incapable of delivering Fantômas to us, the grand duchess Alexandra proposes to offer a public reward payable to whoever brings about the arrest of the elusive criminal.
The money will be collected at the home of the grand duchess, who will pay out a sum of 5,000 francs.
In a small and discreet hotel in the suburbs...
To launch the reward, the grand duchess was giving a grand masked-ball, which Fandor, skilled at edging his way into anywhere, had decided to attend.
By thus 'usurping' the legendary costume of
Fantômas, the journalist hoped to provoke a reaction from the criminal, which would lead him to give himself away.
At the Police Department...
...someone had had the same idea.
The Grand Duchess
Alexandra begs you to attend a masked-ball which she is giving in Hotel Parc des
Princes, from 7pm onwards.
The grand duchess's ball is a success.
In the joyful atmosphere of the ball, no-one, except the grand duchess, took the quarrel between the two Fantômases seriously... or nearly no-one.
A cry in the night...
Fandor, who had recognised the Police Inspector, cared very little, given the situation, for coming in contact with the police.
- Madame, a man has just been murdered in your garden.
To her great relief, the grand duchess saw that the dead man was unknown to her.
The investigation began immediately.
The following morning...
If Juve and Fantômas were one and the same, Juve must have the same wound on his own right arm.
At the Police Station...
- It is absolutely impossible that the prisoner could have got out of his cell that night, and then come back to it.
A narcotic!
Juve demands that all the guards be summoned.
Juve recognizes Nibet,
Fantômas's accomplice, who he often saw at mother
Toulouche's, when he was disguised as the idiot
Cranajour.
Part Four:
Settling of Old Scores.
Abandoned quarries, empty houses, Fandor knew practically all the hide-outs of the underworld in the Paris suburbs.
He explored them one by one to find Fantômas's trail.
It was Fantômas's gang. The gangsters were demanding from father Moche an immediate share of the loot from their last few jobs.
My friends, have confidence.
While I am at the Police
Station, put complete trust in my lieutenant, father Moche.
Upon my release, which will not be long, I will distribute the loot.
- Fantômas
The loot...
The construction of a new wing along the Orfevres
Dock had turned the Halls of
Justice upside down - they were overrun by builders.
ABSOLUTELY CONFIDENTIAL
Inspector Juve resumes his duties at the Police
Department.
But, so as not to hinder the research of that inspector, his release must remain a secret.
- Commissioner of Police.
Since Fantômas had promised to share out the loot upon his release from prison, the gangsters had decided to speed things up.
Meanwhile, in the local police station near the abandoned house...
ABSOLUTELY CONFIDENTIAL
Inspector Juve resumes his duties at the Police
Department.
But, so as not to hinder the research of that inspector, his release must remain a secret.
- Commissioner of Police.
- If you want to catch
Fantômas and his gang, follow me.
The news that the sharing out of the loot was going to take place in the empty house spread quickly among the gangsters.
- If you are Fantômas, we want our share immediately.
If you are Juve, so much the worse for you.
-Juve, it's me, Fandor.
- Tell them that you are
Fantômas and to lift the dark-coloured paving stone in front of you.
- I am Fantômas.
- Look out! The cops!
-No they aren't!
They are some friends in disguise for a job I'm planning.
- How did you find us?
But Tom Bob had disappeared.
To Juve, everything was clear. Fantômas, Tom Bob and father Moche were all one and the same.
The criminal had had his accomplices arrested to keep the loot for himself...
...And the reward for his arrest was a very large sum of money.
Once more Fantômas shot off on the path of crime.
Downloaded From www.AllSubs.org
A NIGHT IN THE SHOW
"Get in line and wait your turn."
Mr. Rowdy.
"My mistake, sir. Your seat is in the second row."
"You're on my hat, sir!"
"You're on mine, too!"
La Belle Wienerwurst.
Next -- Tootsy Frutti, the Snake Charmer.
Dot & Dash.
They say they are clever.
We shall see.
Professor Nix, the Fire Eater.
THE END
.:: ENGsub by Korf (UIN#104538656) ::.
BURLESQUE ON 'CARMEN'
The smugglers.
"A new officer guards the breach in the wall. I will arrange with him to let us pass."
Darn Hosiery, the new officer.
"Do not try to hide any smuggled goods in there."
Pastia, tavern keeper, in league with the smugglers.
"Smugglers pay well for blindness, Señor."
"Do not try to bring any smuggled goods through here."
Carmen, thy Gypsy.
"This Darn Hosiery cannot be bought."
"I will give you this incorruptible officer bound hand and foot -- by love."
Sunset -- and Carmen smiles.
Corporal Morales.
The game begins.
"I'll come tonight to Pastia's."
Under the tavern lights.
"The smuggle goods through, you must stay near Darn Hosiery...
We will give you work in the factory."
Escamillo, a toreador.
"Let the toreador wait."
"We shall see."
"Your charms tonight are for
Darn Hosiery."
"You do not ask me to dance, Señor."
"My kisses are not so easily won."
The smugglers are at the breach.
"Send them away."
"We must use him tonight before he thinks of anything but me."
The Secret Signal.
"Would I come here if I did not love you?"
"They are my people. Let them pass -- for me."
The following day at the cigarette factory.
"Your words hit hard, but I hit harder."
"Let me speak to my uncle."
"They are taking me to prison."
"And I will keep the key to the cell."
"My thanks, Señor -- and goodbye."
"Go to our camp."
"I have paid the full price to make you mine."
"I go to Seville with Escamillo."
Near the bull ring at Seville.
"My chance has come at last.
Fame and fortune await me in the bull ring."
Darn Hosiery follows Carmen to Seville.
"Hosiery waits by the gates for Escamillo."
"Carmen belongs to no man.
She is free."
"I turned traitor and I killed to win you -- then you gave yourself to him!"
"He shall not have you -- my beautiful Carmen!"
"Darn Hosiery, you have killed me -- but I am free!"
THE END
{295}{385} The Dying Swann
{393}{500} Una novela tr·gica de
{1825}{1965} Gizella, mira el mar!
{2700}{2912}Ha visto un gran perro que ha pasado corriendo?
{3401}{3480}Estaba preguntado sobre mi perro...
{3481}{3635}...pero la joven dama no parece|entender ruso
{3700}{3919} Oh, mi hija no puede hablar. Es muy triste.
{4225}{4305} What's this all about, my little birdie?
{4423}{4572} Surely you are not crying because you cannot speak?
{4574}{4742} You have your face, which speaks more than words
{4745}{4915} You have a soul which is more beautiful than words, Gizella
{5262}{5423} Gizella Loves to dance. Dancing is her whole life, her soul
{6561}{6633} Have you hurt yourself?
{6781}{6849} I'll help you back
{6851}{6987} It's my fault. I frightened you and you lost your footing...
{7493}{7630} My God, Gizella, what's happened to your leg?
{7740}{7899} I am very grateful to you for seeing Gizella home
{7944}{8102} Unfortunately, I am the causa of her accident
{8429}{8665} Will you permit me to visit you and enquire about your health?
{9632}{9840} I was looking for you. Come for a ride with me, it's such a sunny day...
{10018}{10250} We'll tell your father we're going for a ride. I think he'll give permission...
{11695}{11918} Gizella, Your face is like no other the earth has ever seen...
{11920}{11992} What need have you of words?
{11993}{12140} Your eyes are immeasureably greater
{12885}{12988} There is no need for words if your soul is singing...
{14384}{14509} My dear, I have some pressing business...
{14511}{14640}...and cannot go walking with you.
{14641}{14767} Let's put it off until tomorrow...
{19334}{19420} What is it, my dear?
{19977}{20110} Take me away from here, as soon as possible
{20112}{20267} To theatre, anywhere... I shall dance...
{20269}{20390} I shall die here... take me away.
{20545}{20760} Don't Gizella. I understand everything. I understand...
{20919}{20994} But think about it
{20994}{21200} She is still very inexperienced. She cannot speak, and all in all...
{21200}{21368} I do not know what I can offer you
{21432}{21646} Oh, take her. You will see that she will fulfill her abilities.
{22615}{22676} No, that's not it
{23381}{23523} Where can I find death? Real death...
{25315}{25419} I didn't find it today, either
{25476}{25554} What didn't you find?
{25614}{25654} Death.
{25754}{25894} More of that nonsense!
{25896}{26025} You have never shown me your pictures...
{26025}{26163} ...but I am sure this is all something trivial
{26165}{26301} Why should you want to go searching for something and getting upset?
{26790}{26946} There is an interesting piece of news
{26946}{27103} The famous ballerina Gizella Raccio is on tour in the town
{27103}{27162} Will you come tomorrow?
{27550}{27716} She has made her reputation as "The Dying Swan"...
{27716}{27788} ...and that is what she will dance tomorrow.
{27981}{28190} "The Dying Swan". She dances. That is death...
{28670}{28807} I shall go. I shall go without fail...
{35057}{35195} Conde Valerian Sergeevich Glinskii
{35195}{35321} If only you knew how grateful I am to you
{35321}{35449} I have found what I have been searching for all my life
{35449}{35575} All my life I have been searching for death...
{35575}{35689} ...and I have found it in your dance
{36367}{36643} Gizella, if you would permit me to draw you it would be a miracle of art
{37463}{37546} I beseech you
{38314}{38427} My house greets a princess
{39128}{39270} You may get dressed in that room
{40394}{40530} You are pretty! You are very pretty!
{42335}{42415} How good it is that you cannot speak
{42415}{42580} I do not know if I exist at all, or whether I am in delirium
{42580}{42727} The most sublime thing in the world is peace...
{42727}{42881} ...and the most sublime peace is in death
{43507}{43576} I have fount it!
{43685}{43877} Gizella Rocco herself is posing for me. Oh, what a picture it will be!
{43877}{44141} I shall show you my work and you will see it is a work of genius
{44952}{45091} But it is untalented... terrible
{47322}{47445} Accept this crown, which is worthy of you
{47445}{47594} On it are the tears of my soul. V. Glinskii
{49293}{49363} Who is that from?
{49469}{49579} I do not like him, Gizella
{49579}{49770} An unpleasant feeling comes over me when I see him
{50275}{50436} Life is more terrible than death. There is no need to be afraid.
{53473}{53634} I, too, like you, was beautiful. I died incarcerated here
{53634}{53823} You are wearing my crown, and you, too, will die here
{54766}{54953} The first tour by the famous dancer Gizella Raccio...
{54953}{55163} ...was an enormous and fully deserved success
{56318}{56388} One more sitting...
{56388}{56552} ...and you will see yourself, Signorina, in all your brilliance
{57311}{57350} Gizella!
{58926}{59048} If I do not receive a response tomorrow...
{59048}{59200} ...your silence will be that joyous response...
{59200}{59370} ...to which I shall come, in order to give all my life to you
{59370}{59489} Your Viktor
{59816}{59953} No... no... it is just a dream
{60421}{60654} I love you! I have been searching for you... searching for a long, long time
{61545}{61662} Signor Cherubino Raccio
{61662}{61895} If you have nothing against your daughter becoming my wife, then...
{64689}{64802} Can this be the same Gizella?
{64802}{64907} Where are those joyless, sad, exhausted eyes?
{64907}{65034} Now her eyes blaze with a different flame
{65034}{65177} No, no, it is not the same Gizella
{66850}{66902} Well, let us begin...
{67522}{67653} Gizella, are you alive? That won't do at all!
{68271}{68509} Be still, Gizella, do not move. That is where beauty and peace lie
{70169}{70216} F I N

Part One
THE ORIENT EXPRESS DISASTER
The Man in Black won the first round but Inspector Juve swore he'd win the second.
Juve lists the criminal's crimes:
Robbery of Princess Danidoff, murder of Lord Beltham, attempted execution of the actor Valgrand.
And now, the Chaleck affair...
 Here, Jérôme, read my report.
Report by Inspector Juve to the Chief of National Police.
The female corpse found at Dr Chaleck's could not be positively identified as the victim was totally disfigured but she carried identification in the name of Lady Beltham, accomplice of the murderer Gurn who escaped prison on his execution day.
Is it really Lady Beltham or a ruse for her to be believed dead? An enigma .
Another enigma: How did the body end up at Dr. Chaleck's?
He seems above suspicion because he immediately informed the police upon finding the body in his apartment, after being away for a few days.
Lastly, the coroner could not determine the exact cause of death.
The body appears to have been mangled.
The investigation continues. Juve.
 Calm down, kid.
Old Juve knows what to do.
The next day on rue Frochot, as Dr. Chaleck exits his home...
Tailing the Doc:tor's car,
Juve and Fandor reach Boulevard de la Chapelle.
During the trip, the elegant Dr. Chaleck transformed himself into a shady character.
While Juve followed the ruffian,
Fandor tailed the strumpet.
My beloved Loupart, be at the train station at 3 o'clock with some henchmen.
The old coot I told you about, Mr. Martialle, from Kessler & Barru Wines, will be carrying 150,000 francs.
He's mad about me and believes me lily-white.
That's why he wants me to go on the trip with him.
Your Josephine.
Another ruffian follows Juve...
Fandor, luckier than Juve, hasn't lost the girl.
METRO LINE 2
Dear Juve,
I'm on the right track.
The bird has returned to her nest and I'm on watch.
Fandor.
One hour later, the strumpet, transformed, exits her home.
She goes to the train station to meet Martialle, wine merchant.
As planned, Loupart's accomplices are waiting on the platform.
Good idea to have chosen to last car, dear Joséphine .
Here we'll be ideally alone...
To what fate does this train lead Martialle and Fandor?
In the unhitched car, Fantômas's gang may now operate at leisure.
Fandor, dozing in the next compartment, experiences a similar misadventure.
There was only one track, that of the Orient Express .
And now the incline is causing the car to roll backwards.
The Orient Express .
Loupart's car awaits the crooks.
Kessler and Barru, Wine & Spirits
Mr. Bordier and Mr. Pontarlier:
Following our discussions and to seal our partnership in the St. Blaise distillery, please receive from our representative
150 thousand-franc notes, cut in half.
The other halves will be delivered in 30 days, after the contract's clauses have been honoured.
Sincerely, Kessler & Barru.
Loupart decides to get the missing halves from Kessler & Barru.
But also to rid himself of his arch enemy.
To Juve, National Police, Paris.
All is well.
To close the case, be at the Bercy warehouse, alone but armed, tomorrow night at 11 o'clock, near the Kessler wine cellars.
Your friend, Fandor.
The following night,
Juve arrives at the Bercy warehouse carrying his trusty pistol.
Fandor, expecting the bandits to come to Bercy to get the rest of the banknotes, is also there.
Fantômas's gang sets fire to the barrels.
Part Two
AT THE “CROCODILE”
A few weeks later, Joséphine, in the company of an American boxer, is popping the champagne at the Crocodile.
Juve and Fandor, to relax their frayed nerves, had also come to enjoy a night out in Montmartre.
 But... It's the strumpet,
Loupart's accomplice, the woman on the train.
 Allow me to introduce my friend
Inspector Juve, National Police.
 Where is Chaleck?
Answer me or I'll arrest you .
A gentleman is waiting for you outside.
And 10 minutes later...
Part Three:
THE HAUNTED VILLA
Seeking to forget,
Lady Beltham, Fantômas's accomplice from when he called himself Gurn, now resides in a convent in Neuilly.
Lady,
Do you still refuse to see me?
Last night, I visited your empty villa and was shocked to find it up for sale.
There, alone in the dark,
I relived our past.
Lady, I must speak with you.
Meet me Wednesday at midnight in what was once your room.
Gurn
Wednesday, shortly before midnight, in the shadows of the garden.
Again under his spell, she promises to return to the villa every Wednesday at midnight.
One morning shortly after, two figures patrol near the villa.
Pretending to be potential buyers,
Juve and Fandor visit the house.
This pen was used less than two days ago.
Do you come here to do your correspondence, my friend?
There's a light in this room each Wednesday.
I think the house is haunted .
 Obviously.
Ghosts come here every Wednesday to pen love letters .
It's the heating vent for the furnace in the basement.
The cistern for rain water.
The following Wednesday at midnight.
Lady Beltham arrives as usual.
Without noticing Juve and Fandor,
Fantômas closes the vent to block the cold draft.
Yes, we'll run away together but in four days, when my silent executioner will have finally gotten rid of Juve .
Four nights later, with Fandor's help,
Juve prepares himself for the visit of his mysterious  silent executioner.
Shortly before dawn.
The silent executioner.
The steel spikes turn out to be ineffective.
 Help me, Fandor .
Part Four
THE MAN IN BLACK
That morning,
Fantômas daydreams of Lady Beltham in the garden of her empty villa.
The cops want to finish him, but instead, he'll finish them .
Informed of his presence,
Juve orders his men to storm the villa.
 Listen .
It sounds like breathing...
 The silent executioner.
Farewell, men of justice.
Between May 1916 and October
1917, Chaplin produced his finest short comedies as a series for the Mutual Film Corporation."
"Fulfilling the Mutual contract, I suppose, was the happiest period of my career." 
"The Immigrant was Charlie Chaplin's eleventh film in his series of twelve Mutual comedies, being first released on June 17, 1917.  
Such were Chaplin's demands for perfection by this time that 90.000 feet of negative was photographed for the production, and Charlie went four days and nights without rest while editing
The Immigrant to final lenght.
The Immigrant 
Dinner Time 
More rolling 
"Mother lost her money." 
"You pickpocket!" 
"Miss, come here!"
The arrival in the land of liberty. 
"Good-bye" 
Later... hungry and broke.
Beans!!! 
"What's the trouble, waiter?" 
"He was ten cents short." 
"Coffee for the lady." 
"I am an artist." 
"Bring my check also." 
"I'll engage both of you now, starting tomorrow." 
A couple of dollars on account. 
MARRIAGE LICENSES
The End subtitles by <<necdeath>>
THE MUSKETEERS
OF PIG ALLEY
New York's other side.
The poor musician goes away to improve his fortune.
Later.
The little lady meets Snapper Kid, the chief of the Musketeers.
Alone.
The musician returning with replenished purse,
...meets the Musketeers in Pig Alley.
The musician determined to recover his stolen money.
A friend tries to cheer the little lady.
The little lady at the gangster's ball.
Fear of the big boss forces them to settle the fight outside.
The gangsters feudal war.
One good turn deserves another.
Links in the system.
Part One
THEFT AT THE ROYAL PALACE HOTEL
One o'clock in the morning.
Princess Sonia Danidoff returns to her hotel.
The envelope is ready.
Would Your Highness care to verify the 120,000 francs are all there?
Terrified, the Princess raises the alarm.
 I'll run to fetch the police.
Shortly thereafter, Princess Danidoff receives a visit from the inspector.
INSPECTOR JUVE
NATIONAL POLICE
Part Two
THE DISAPPEARANCE OF LORD BELTHAM
In Inspector Juve's office, he and his friend Jérôme Fandor, a reporter for The Capital, read about the latest crimes.
The Royal Palace Hotel affair, the disappearance of Lord Beltham...
The public is troubled by this wave of unsolved crimes.
A knock at the door.
NATIONAL POLICE
Inspector Juve is assigned to locate Lord Beltham now mysteriously missing for over a week.
Foul play: is suspected.
Chief of National Police
Inspector Juve goes to Lady Beltham's villa.
Meanwhile, the missing man's wife drinks in the words of a certain Gurn, enthralled by his brooding charm.
The public is alarmed at recent events:
First, the Royal Palace Hotel theft and now, the mysterious disappearance of wealthy Englishman Lord Beltham.
After 10 days, Lady Beltham's searches remain fruitless.
Every citizen must ask:
What are the police doing?
When questioned, police officials seem to have been struck dumb.
Shall Paris become a place where honest folk fear to walk the streets?
Inspector Juve
National Police
Peculiarly excited, Gurn agrees to remain hidden in an adjoining room from which he can eavesdrop.
 Did Lord Beltham leave any clues?
An address book, perhaps?
 Do you know this Gurn, Madame?
To the Director of the South Steamship Co.
Please pick up three trunks from my home at 147, rue Bevert, 20th arrondissement to be sent to Johannesburg, where I shall have them collected.
The concierge will unlock my apartment for you. Gurn.
Juve decides to visit Gurn at the address he's found...
Please pick up three trunks from my home at 147, rue Bevert, 20th arrondissement to be sent to Johannesburg, where I shall have them collected.
A body.
Blank calling cards.
And so, Gurn and Fantômas are one and the same...
For months, Juve and Fandor keep constant watch over Lady Beltham's villa.
The next day, the headline of the Gaulois.
THE TURBULENT ARREST OF GURN
A MAN SOUGHT BY THE POLICE
FOR MONTHS
Part Three
ALONGSIDE THE GUILLOTINE
Ever since Gurn has been sentenced to death, a car stops each night outside the prison.
Lady Beltham finally makes contact with a certain Nibet, prison guard.
Nibet tells his colleague about the deal he's made with the lovely schemer.
Be brave.
Lady Beltham
On Gurn's orders,
Nibet goes to Lady Beltham's villa.
I hereby receive the sum of 100,000 francs in exchange for arranging a 15-minute meeting between Lady Beltham and the condemned man, Gurn, at a house near the prison.
March 12, 1912
Meanwhile, Paris is entertained by what once made it tremble.
Valgrand, on the stage of the Grand Tréteau, prepares to play the condemned man.
For the Grand Tréteau's new production,
The Bloody Stain,
Valgrand has modelled his performance after Gurn, Lord Beltham's murderer.
On the day before Gurn's execution, this is a sinister coincidence.
Lady Beltham, from far back in a box, is struck, more than any other, by the actor's resemblance to his model.
The première of The Bloody Stain draws to a close and the audience admires
Valgrand's performance of the condemned man's last morning.
Sir, Your performance touched the very depths of my heart.
Allow me to congratulate you.
I have a request which
I hope will not seem too strange...
After the show, would you join me for tea in my apartment on Boulevard Arago?
Naturally, for this secret visit, my dearest wish would be for you to keep on the costume and make-up which, as you've guessed, make you resemble the darkest despair of my soul.
Lady Beltham
74, boulevard Arago
P.S. Enter through the garden.
Tomorrow morning, the infamous murderer Gurn will be executed.
All remember the trial, followed nationwide, in which the cynical criminal aroused public indignation with his anarchic retorts.
Tomorrow before dawn, it is with relief that the awaiting crowd shall witness dropping into the basket a head possessed by criminal guile rather than philosophy, art and science.
As he walks,
Valgrand passes by the prison.
Meanwhile,
Nibet and his accomplice, bribed  by Lady Beltham, remove Gurn from his cell.
In a rented apartment on Boulevard Arago,
Lady Beltham anxiously awaits the one to whom she was bound by love and murder.
Did you fix the sugar?
The door bell rings.
As the narcotic takes effect,
Valgrand is overcome by an irresistible drowsiness.
The fifteen minutes have passed, and the guards return to fetch their prisoner.
 Hear that hammering?
They're erecting the guillotine for Valgrand.
Deceived, Nibet and his accomplice return to the prison with the fake Gurn.
Dawn approaches and Gurn forces Lady Beltham to watch the executioner's final preparations.
In the prison, Juve, Fandor and the officials await the condemned man.
The grim procession arrives at last.
Even with all your tricks, you can't escape me forever, Fantômas.
Back at Juve's office, the two friends swear to bring the criminal to justice.
The young reporter writes an item for The Capital.
An astonishing occurrence at the prison this morning:
As the executioner began to remove the condemned man's collar, mere instants before his execution, we realized that the man about to be decapitated was not the condemned man.
By what machination was the actor
Valgrand substituted for Gurn?
An investigation will perhaps reveal the truth.
In the meantime,
Fantômas is still alive.
And he is at liberty.
Fantômas is at liberty...
Juve's worst nightmare.
After the explosion at Lady Beltham's villa,
Jérôme Fandor, gravely injured, is slowly recovering.
THE FIGHT AGAINST THE BANDITS
AFTERMATH OF THE TERRIBLE
EXPLOSION IN NEUILLY
The gardens surrounding Lady Beltham's villa on Richard-Wallace Blvd. in Neuilly were an apocalyptic sight.
The wreckage teemed with police, rescue workers and ambulance crews pulling charred and dismembered bodies from the rubble.
The nameless bodies attest to the violence of the explosion.
INSPECTOR JUVE
AMONG THE VICTIMS
Reading these words,
Fandor realises the gaping hole the loss of his friend is going to create in his life.
Next to the courthouse, a second-hand shop run by Ma Toulouche, a well-known fence.
She's recently hired a simpleton nicknamed Crânajour due to the fact that his cranium seems singularly empty.
Toulouche's right-hand man, a prison guard named Nibet...
The cellar under the shop connects to the sewers which empty into the Seine.
Part One
THE TRAGEDY IN RUE NORVINS
Jacques Dollon, a young ceramist, works on rue Norvins in the heart of Montmartre.
The next morning, the cleaning lady arrives.
Terrified, she returns with the police.
 Baroness de Vibraye, dead.
But how did she get here?
Dear Madame,
If you'd care to visit Montmartre one evening,
I'd love to show you some ceramics
I'm preparing for the salon.
My sister Elisabeth should return soon.
Humbly and respectfully yours,
Jacques Dollon
Unable to prove his innocence, the young artist is brought before the investigating judge.
In the Anthropometry Department.
Jacques Dollon, dazed, is then transferred to a courthouse holding cell.
In his cell, Jacques Dollon falls prey to a vicious attack.
Once again, it's Nibet at work.
Mean while, in The Capital’s newsroom,
Fandor, fully recovered, is finishing his article on the tragedy in rue Norvins.
 Hello, Fandor? Breaking news.
Dollon was found strangled in his cell.
This calls for an update.
Breaking: News
We've learned that Jacques Dollon, who was arrested for the murder of Baroness de Vibraye, has been found strangled in his cell.
Our investigation is under way.
Very quickly,
Fandor arrives at the courthouse, which becomes his second home from that moment on.
He's immediately admitted to the office of Judge Fuselier, who is in charge of the case.
The journalist hands the judge his article entitled  Scandal at the Courthouse.
Elisabeth Dollon, having returned from a voyage, requests the judge's permission to see her brother,
Jacques Dollon, who is being detained in a holding cell.
 Miss, you cannot see your brother...
 He is dead.
 Where is the body?
Comforted by Jérôme Fandor,
Elisabeth Dollon leaves the courthouse, that   House of Tears.
In The Capital's newsroom,
Fandor writes a new article on the courthouse mystery.
How can a corpse disappear from a cell without anyone noticing?
This is the astounding question we may pose the authorities.
JÉRÔME FANDOR,
BE CAREFUL.
THE MATTER YOU ARE INVESTIGATING
IS OF UTMOST IMPORTANCE
BUT MAY HAVE TERRIBLY
DANGEROUS CONSEQUENCES...
It takes more than that to scare the young journalist.
Elisabeth Dollon arrives at rue Norvins to begin the painful inventory of her brother's studio.
Baroness de Vibraye,
April 3, Jacques Dollon
Hold...
Sonia Danidoff, April 19
Thomery, during May
Nanteuil, end of May
Meanwhile, in the sewers under the courthouse on Île de la Cité, the Man in Black prepares to perform a gruesome operation on the  young ceramist's corpse.
Part Two
FANDOR'S INVESTIGATION
Fandor has himself locked up in the courthouse in order to discover how a corpse could disappear from a holding cell there.
Crânajour lodges in the garret over Toulouche's shop, and its skylight overlooks the courthouse roof.
In an air duct, there are tracks...
Midnight. In her shop,
Ma Toulouche plays cards.
Cargo arrives via the Seine at midnight.
Be there to help me unload.
The Sailor.
 To our health, Ernestine.
Nibet is furious at Crânajour for his actions.
But now Fandor knows how a body could have been removed from the holding cell without using the door...
Part Three
THE PRINCESS'S NECKLACE
That evening, the cream of Paris society throngs the party hosted by Thomery, a prominent sugar manufacturer, in honour of his upcoming marriage to Princess Sonia Danidoff.
Thomery shows the princess the boudoir provided for her private use.
An incident.
 Pardon me.
I must fix this tear.
Once again, it's Nibet.
He catches the necklace and calmly walks off.
A senior police official is among the guests.
He immediately begins searching for clues.
 Did you notice that fingerprint?
We've got him.
The next day, in the Anthropometry Department, the senior official compares his photograph with the police files.
The fingerprint is a perfect match to one recently filed...
FIRST AND LAST NAME:
JACQUES DOLLON
BORN FEBRUARY 20, 1888
IN PARIS
PROFESSION:
CERAMIST/PAINTER
RIGHT HAND FINGERPRINTS
I'd like to believe you, but that's absurd.
Dollon died a week ago, and the necklace was stolen last night.
Perhaps so, but Dr. Bertillon's system is infallible.
The print is definitely
Jacques Dollon's.
Part Four
NANTEUIL, THE BANKER
A few weeks later, in the banker's office.
To Nanteuil, from Detouche.
Market order to buy 500 shares of Thomery stock, deliverable in five days.
 Sir, a lady asks to see you.
She wouldn't give her name.
Lady Beltham, Fantômas's mistress, accomplice and victim.
Unable to resist her tyrant, the poor woman obeys.
We have reason to believe that Princess Sonia Danidoff would be interested in these pearls, which are just as fine as those stolen from her.
We could obtain a similar necklace for her at an excellent price.
3 o'clock, Weber Restaurant,
Buttes-Chaumont Park.
Thomery goes to the princess to tell her of the dastardly extortion.
The meeting at Weber Restaurant.
The emissary of the thief is waiting.
Part Five
ELISABETH DOLLON
The young lady has taken lodgings at Bourrat's boardinghouse in Auteuil.
Baroness de Vibraye,
April 3, Jacques Dollon
Hold...
Sonia Danidoff, April 19
Thomery, during May
Nanteuil, end of May
Bourrat's boardinghouse is quite reputable, but, due to a premonition,
Elisabeth seeks a hiding place for the strange list.
She resolves to accept the aid
Jérôme Fandor offered her.
Dear Mr. Fandor,
In my brother's studio,
I found a strange list of names and dates, which recent crimes have given a sinister meaning.
I don't dare risk mailing it.
Would you come get it tomorrow at Bourrat's boardinghouse?
At midnight.
Fantômas himself comes to search for the list he lost at Jacques Dollon's.
Elisabeth is deeply asleep, doubtlessly due to the herbal tea she drank before bed...
After a fruitless search,
Fantômas decides the young woman will take his secret to the grave.
The next morning,
Fandor arrives at The Capital.
In my brother's studio, I found a strange list of names and dates, which recent crimes have given a sinister meaning.
I don't dare risk mailing it.
Would you come get it tomorrow at Bourrat's boardinghouse?
Elisabeth has regained consciousness.
Fandor decides to hide her in a convent for her safety.
And Fandor goes to recover the mysterious document.
Baroness de Vibraye,
April 3, Jacques Dollon
Hold... ditto
Sonia Danidoff, April 19
Thomery, during May
Nanteuil, end of May
Footsteps on the stairs...
A police captain with a striking resemblance to Nanteuil, the banker, accompanied by an aide oddly similar to Nibet, the guard...
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
SEARCH WARRANT
By order of Judge Fuselier,
Captain Dulac is authorised to immediately search the lodgings of Elisabeth Dollon at Bourrat's boarding house in Auteuil.
By taking everything,
Fantômas is sure to finally recover the incriminating list.
But... it's Thomery.
Shaken, Fandor returns to The Capital's newsroom.
The editor requests Fandor to write an article as soon as possible on Thomery's mysterious disappearance, which has been causing his company's stocks to crash over the past 24 hours.
Thomery, during May
Nanteuil, end of May
Jérôme listen to this.
Havas News Agency
We have learned that
Mr. Thomery's body has just been found in an empty apartment on rue Lecourbe.
The deceased had been strangled with a police chief's scarf on which were found, once again, the fingerprints of Jacques Dollon, who committed suicide in his holding cell.
The fake police chief at Bourrat's boardinghouse.
His scarf around
Thomery's corpse's neck.
Once again,
Jacques Dollon's fingerprints...
Nothing but bizarre clues.
Part Six
THE GLOVES OF HUMAN SKIN
That morning, near police headquarters at quai des Orfèvres,
Fandor again studies the mysterious list sorely missing his friend Juve's intuition.
Juve's office.
 It's you, Juve...
It's really you.
 I needed to hide.
Thanks to Crânajour,
I was able to get close to Fantômas's gang and save your life in the sewers.
Baroness de Vibraye,
April 3, Jacques Dollon
Hold... ditto
Sonia Danidoff, April 19
Thomery, during May
Nanteuil, end of May
You and I are going to pay this Nanteuil a visit.
JÉRÔME FANDOR
JOURNALIST, THE CAPITAL
INSPECTOR JUVE
NATIONAL POLICE
 The secret of the dead man's prints.
The skin of Jacques Dollon's hands.
 You're finished, Fantômas.
Once again,
Fantômas escapes the police.
Once again, the fearsome bandit is at large in a society against which he plans nothing but ruin and suffering.
Father Sergius
Based on the story by Tolstoy [not Tchekov!].
Great success, thanks to the perfect mastery of the Russian director, Yakov Protazanov, who adapted the work of the great writer.
Several years have gone by.
The cinematographic art has made huge progress.
And yet "Father Sergius" still stands as an important landmark in the cinema history of Russia, and has lost none of its artistic value. 
The father of Prince Kossotski, colonel of the guard in retirement, had pronounced, as he lay dying, his wish that his son follow a career in the army.
The children...
Six years went by. Kossotski distinguished himself at the Academy for his brilliant skills and infinite pride.
And would have been an outstanding cadet, if not for his violent temper.
"These chops are inedible!"
"Silence! To solitary confinement...forward, march!"
Nikolai Pavlovitch often came to visit the regiment.
When he was 18 years old, Kossotski was promoted to officer in the aristocratic regiment of the guard. and as always...
Ten years went by. Kossotski seemed like a completely ordinary officer.
But he had one secret goal: to obtain the most brilliant position in high society.
Countess Korotbova, one of the Empress' favorite maids of honor, was at first very cold towards him.
"The dances will soon begin."
"First, the mazurka."
"Will you promise me the mazurka, countess?"
"You are dancing, you are having fun, I am pleased, very pleased."
"You have promised me the mazurka, countess."
"I am tired."
"Sincerely in love with Mary, Kassotski's passion does not let him see what everyone knows: She is Nikolai's mistress."
"People are beginning to talk about us...
It would be good if you could find a husband."
"But... maybe, it is possible."
"I understand, your Highness."
The following day.
"My daughter and I would be very pleased to see you."
Two months later, Kossotski proposes.
"Look how beautiful it is over there."
"I would like to have an answer."
"As mother wishes."
"I am very happy, Prince."
"Mother... and what if he finds out?"
"But if he loves you truly... he will forgive you, if he finds out."
On the wedding's eve.
"You know... in the beginning I wanted to get closer to you... in a way not entirely disinterested...but then..."
"You are not angry at me?"
"I must tell everything... I loved him."
"We all love him."
"You... were his mistress?"
"By marrying me, you wanted to hide all this."
On the same day.
"I resign... immediately."
Arriving in his village, Kossotski decided very quickly to enter the monastery.
"My decision is firm."
"Perhaps you understand me."
By entering the monastery, Kossotski showed he despised everything that seemed important to others.
"I must speak to the Father Superior."
And soon... and he could...
"Sin is getting the better of me."
Three years later, Prince Stepan Kossotski went into holy orders by the name of Sergius.
Four years later, Sergius was transferred to a large monastery in the capital.
"Tomorrow... will you celebrate the Mass?"
The superior was a skillful man who had achieved his ecclesiastic career with the aid of his relations in high circles.
"And couldn't I see my old comrade, Father Sergius?"
"It's that prince, Kossotski."
"I'm happy to see you in this angelic appearance."
"Abbot... you expose me to temptations."
In order to avoid any temptation,
Sergius becomes a hermit in the far away Tambino desert.
In the nearby town.
"It's always the same. I can't stand it... I'm bored."
Makovkina, an eccentric divorcee, disturbed all of town with her extravagances.
"Careful, it's loaded!"
"This is the road to Tambino."
"I'll spend the night over at Kossotski's."
"Dear Lord, why won't you give me faith?"
"Come get me at three o'clock in the morning."
"Allow me to come inside... I'm freezing."
"I'm not the devil, I'm just a sinner, I'm lost...
I'm looking for refuge."
"I wandered away from the path, and if I hadn't stumbled upon your cell..."
"Sit here... I'll go over there."
"Don't come in.  I'm soaked... my feet are frozen."
"Don't come in.  I must undress to dry myself ..."
"Listen, help me! I don't know what's happening to me."
"Father Sergius... Prince Kossotski!"
"I'll come back at once."
"What's wrong?"
"Let me take care of your wound."
"Go away!"
At three o'clock sharp.
"You have really won your bet.  Congratulations."
The adventure with Makovkina was starting to spread and Father Sergius' reputation was strengthened.
"Cure him, father."
9 years went by.  More and more visitors arrived.
Next to Father Sergius' cell, some monks built a big church.
"Little Father, don't leave us."
"Until tomorrow; today I can't."
"But you don't look like a monk today, my precious."
In the evening, the merchant ordered his daughter to prepare.
"Holy Father! Bless my daughter so that she be cured of her illness. 
It's been two years since she lost her reason.
She doesn't go out during the day... she's afraid of the light."
"I have seen you in my dreams."
"I saw that you would lay your hand on my chest... here, like this."
"What's possessing you... pull yourself together!"
"Really now!"
At dawn.
"We need to cut wood.  Give me the axe."
In the evening he was already far from the monastery.
"I'm going to Tambino to see Father Sergius."
"Sergius is no longer there.  Not any more."
He wanted to pray... but there was no one to pray to...
God was not there.
And he went from village to village, living off alms.
One day.
"Who are you?"
"Where's your passport?"
He was classed among the vagabonds, judged, and sent to Siberia.
THE END
THE UNDESIRABLE
A classical Hungarian peasant-play, written in 1880, in 4 acts
By Edward Tóth
Film by Michael Kertész
Original costumes and views of a Carpatian village in Hungary
Sarah represented by the famous tragical actress of the Hungarian National
Theatre Mary Jászai.
Betty, her dauther represented by Lilly Berki
Nick, represented by Michel Várkonyi of the Hungarian National Theatre.
Jim, a vagabond
First act.
Feeling his end, Gabriel, the old peasant tell his secret to Betty, grown up in his house.
"Dear child! ...I am not your father..."
"You are the dauther of my late brother Paul..."
My poor brother was an old man when he married a young wife...
He had an awful temper and a jealous character..."
"He made your mother suffer so much that she, in a desperate moment, killed him..."
"You came to my house a poor orphan without father and mother..."
"And where is my mother?"
"Your mother is in prison, or dead...
"God bless you Betty, be a good and honest girl always..."
Mr. Kontra, a true specimen of the hen-pecked husband, is an enthusiastic friend of gallant adventures...
!One evening only!
Splendid girls' orchestra in the Café" Merry Widow". Coctails!
Champagne! Wines! Excellent cuisine!
Dear angel. Why don't you take a maid again?...You never finish your work...
Sarah is finishing her
15th year in the prison...
Mrs. Paul Angyal born Sarah
Lehotinszky,having accomplished her 15 years of punishment, is to be released this day...
"Great God!...15 years..."
In the employment office.~
In the "Merry Widow"...
Mrs. Kontra has a son, Nick, from her first marriage, a good serious boy.
"Mother, you certainly caught a fine husband! You better hand me over my inheritance, before your husband spends it in the Café-Concert."
"What a sweet voice!..."
"You are the new maid?"
"Yes Sir."
"Where did you serve before?"
"Nowhere, Sir, until now..."
Mrs. Kontra getting angry...
"An umbrella? What for?!
It isn't raining!...
"They are coming, my dear parents, I should like to be present at the Peace-treaty..."
...and the little maid was wondering, why there is no peace on earth...
At the market.
Sarah is arraving in her native village...
The Sheriff appreciates the qualities of good wine...
"Hallo boy! Where is the Sheriff?"
"...I was just dreaming of a
2000 years old witch..."
End of the first act.~
Second act.
"I love you...I love you since the first moment I saw you."
"You guessed it...I love her and I shall marry her..."
"...Let me tell your fortune..."
"You will be very rich and happy..."
"Do leave me alone!"
"Oh! Those men! Old, young, they're all alike..."
But my dearest. I am absolutly innocent,.
She tried to flirt me..."
"No, no madam, no! It is a lie! I am a honest girl, even if I am your maid!"
"And now, my little lamb..."
"Let me have my papers..."Let me go far away from here, to a country with better men..."
"It isn't so easy...Wait a minute...
I shall call a policeman, who will conduct you to your native village..."
"Let me lock her up..."
"Madam wants to send me to my native town... I would rather die..."
Jim, the incorrigible vagabond is making his daily inspection.
"Am I not a lucky boy?..."
"Oh! Look here! Watches, chains, rings...
God sent me here surely..."
"What is that? The door is open?...
Everything broken open?..."
"Our father in Heaven, hallowed be thy name..."
Nick came back with Betty to defend her before his mother.
"You have been at home...
You ought to know what happened..."
"Only Betty could have done that..."
"I swear by God and by all that is dear to me, that I did not do it."
"Well, I'll go to jail, if you force me.
But you must prove that I have done it...
Good bye, Mr. Nick!
"If I could see my dear little girl, only once..."
End of the second act.~
Third act.
...and Betty, the poor, innocent girl, has been forcerly removed to her native town...
On the road.
Dear Mother!
I leave your house as I cannot live without Betty! I love her and if I cannot find her, I shall never return.
Forgive your Nick
"Please Sheriff, has Betty Angyal been brought here yet?..."
"Tell me, where could
I find the Sheriff?"
"I was ordered to bring from our town this undesirable girl.
She was born here. Her name is Betty
Angyal, occupation: servant-girl."
"I don't mind... Stay here then... but be good, otherwise you know your place..."
"Let me see your papers."
"I followed you, because I cannot live without you and cannot forget you..."
"Tell me as truly as if you would stand before the altar, that you did not see the jewels in our house..."
"Let me taste it...
My throat is so dry..."
"Could you sell me six boxes of sulphur-matches?...
"Perhaps these matches will deliver me from my unhappy life..."
"A bottle of wine here, old fellow!...
But of the best... I am rich, I am a gentleman..."
"Hallo! Old sorceress, drink!..."
"My angel, you could be my grandmother..."
"Look here! A new customer..."
"Please! Which is better, wine or brandy?
I don't feel well, give me some wine: it will help me..."
Happy men, who can sing so merrily.
End of the third act.
Fouth act.
Jim, feeling himself rich, wants to appear before Betty as a
"distinguished foreigner".
"Look here now, if you want to see a gentleman..."
"Good Gracious!... But all this is from the house of Mr. and Mrs. Kontra...
He must have all the rest too..."
"All right, dearest... I had the most serious intentions...
If you think to make a better match..."
The young girl wins the friendship of Sarah...
Sarah is telling her life, her happiness, her sorrowfull fate...
And Betty discovers her lost mother in the old woman and falls to her feet...
"What do you say?!...
Who are you?..."
"Mother, my dear, dear mother!..."
"Here, take some medicine..."
"Call, call quickly a hundred doctors!..."
"You drank of this bottle?...
Great God, it was poison..."
"No, No! I cannot die now, now that I have found her!
No, I shall struggle with my Fate,
I will be happy, happy again..."
"Be honest always... You know, what it means to be straight... honesty makes the poorest man happy..."
"Forgive my sins...
I feel... the end, death...
The name of the Lord be praised, now and in all eternity. Amen..."
"Arrest this man. He has done everything... he stole the jewels and the other things..."
"Here is the money and the jewels.
Now undo everything you have done against Betty."
Betty passed four weeks in the hospital...
"There is no danger anymore.
All she needs is rest."
"Don't be in such a hurry now!
I know the way to jail better than all of you put together!"
"My mother will know her duty."
The wedding.
Every cloud has a silver lining... after the storms come happy, sunny days...
The End
The Divine Comedy by Dante Alighieri.
HELL
Art direction:
Francesco Bertolini, Adolfo Padovan
Technical direction:
Emilio Roncarolo
Dante: Salvatore Papa
Virgilio Arturo Pirovano
Conte Ugolino: G. Liguoro
Lucifero: A. Milla
Contributor:Emilio Beretta
Dante imagines himself lost in a dark and rough jungle.
"Half way through life I was in a dark forest, because I had lost the right path."
Three beasts - a panther, a lion and a wolf -
Prevent Dange from climbing up the hill of salvation.
Beatrice descends from heaven in limbo with Virgil and begs to help Dante.
"I, Beatrice, am the one who makes you walk;
Site come desire to return;
Love moves me, and leads me to talk.
Fifteen
Dante, saved by Virgil, addresses his company in hell.
"I went the hard and wild way."
Hell's Gate.
"For me it leads to the suffering city, for me it leads to eternal suffering,
For me it is to people convicted.
Abandon, all hope, ye who enter here! "
The river Acheron on which Charon transports souls to the other shore.
"Charon, demon, with eyes of fire, calls all collected; lashes with the paddle anyone who is late."
Limbo, where all are punished who were not baptized.
"... Living without hope in the desire."
Homer, Horace, Ovid and Lucan, welcome Virgil and Dante who they agree with him.
"Being the sixth among such great sages."
The noble castle, which houses the great spirits.
Minos, who judges the souls and assigns punishment.
"There Minos growled horribly."
Lustful, tormented by a whirlpool.
"The infernal storm, which never ceases, he leads to the spirits his prey,
He harasses and beats them back."
Paolo and Francesca.
"What pigeons calls of desire, sweet nest with raised wing, they will want the wind to carry them. "
The story of Francesca.
"We read one day a delight, how hurt love of Lanzarote; alone together without any suspicion."
Dante, touched by Francesca's story, sees her vanish.
"And I fell as a dead body falls."
Cerberus, cruel beast, guards gluttons, barking with three mouths, and offense afflicts them.
The wolverines, drenched by an eternal rain, howl like dogs.
Ciaco predicts to Dante that bloody feuds will rend Florence.
Pluto guards prodigals and misers.
Prodigal and covetous, with a chest dragging heavy weights ... injuring each other
The Styx, in which are immersed sloths and the angry, beaten in various ways.
Flegias, the famous atheist, transports Dante and Virgil to the city of Dis.
Filippo Argenti is recognized and offended.  Dante tries to hit him.
"... He held out both hands to a tree; the teacher avoided more prudent, saying, "Go with the other dogs!"
The city of Dis, where the infidels are punished.
Dante, rejected and hindered by demons, threatened ... by the presence of three rages on the tower, is aided by the help of an angel.
Heretics, buried in tombs of fire.
Farinata degli Uberti.  Dante predicted his exile.
"... He stood with his chest and forehead as if to despise hell itself."
Cavalcanti questioned by his son, Guido.
The tomb of Pope Anastasius.
Victim of suicide, converted into gnarled trunks, where harpies nest.
"... I cut a branch of a large blackthorn; and its trunk cried, 'Why do you hurt me?'"
Pier Della Vigna, accused of treason, deprived of his sight by order of Emperor Frederick II.
After the torture, he committed suicide.
Wasteful wealth itself, persecuted and lacerated by dogs.
"The forest was filled behind them with black dogs, running and barking."
Violence against God, nature and art, tortured by a rain of fire.
Capaneo.
"... The largest unconcerned fire and lies scornful and fierce."
The poets descend into the Malebolge on the shoulders of Gerión.
"She goes swimming slowly, very slowly; turns and descends ..."
The ten graves of Malebolge.
First circle
Ruffians, punished by demons, are whipped.
Second circle
Flatterers and loose women are immersed in manure.
Alesio Interminei and Thais.
"... That dirty and disheveled slave, that there scratches with her nails, and now she lies there.  Thais is the prostitute "
Third Circle
The greedy are buried upside down, with the soles of their feet on fire.
Pope Nicholas III.
Dante rages against the Papacy.
Fourth Circle
Soothsayers, neck and face twisted, walking backwards.
Fifth Circle
The angry, immersed in boiling pitch, are guarded by demons.
Malacoda choose the ten demon devils to escort the poets.
Ciampolo falls into the power of the demons and, deceiving them, escapes.
Two of them are fighting.
Demons chasing the poets.
Sixth Circle
Hypocrites, walking under heavy blankets of lead.
Caiaphas, crucified on the floor and trampled by anyone who passes.
Seventh Circle
Thieves, bitten horribly by snakes.
Vanni Fucci predicted to Dante the defeat of the Whites.
Thieves of public money, men converted into snakes and vice versa.
Eighth Circle
Fraudulent counselors, each wrapped in a flame.
"... Odysseus and Diomedes are in there, tortured ..."
Ninth Circle
Those who sow discord and schisms, mutilated by demons.
Muhammad with his torn chest.
Born Bertram head disembodied.
"Gripping the head hair cut short, like a lantern carrying it in your hand."
Tenth Circle
Counterfeiters, converted to lepers, crazy and sick.
The Nembrot, Efialte, Antaeus. Giant
Anteo holds the poets in his hands.
"... Slightly in the background, ...
... He led us."
Traitors, submerged in the frozen lake of Cocytus.
The Antenora
The traitors of the motherland.
Dante does not want to reveal who they are.
Count Ugolino, gnawing on the skull of Archbishop Ruggeri.
"From the fierce meal he lifted his mouth."
Count Ugolino recounts the story of his death ... and his sons, in the Tower of Pisa.
"... And it was me, and blind, groping about for them,
Two days I called to them, but they were dead.  After the pain followed more fasting."
The Tolomea
Friends, traitors.
Friar Alberigo prays to Dante to remove the ice from their eyes.
Judea
The traitors of their benefactors.
Lucifer.
The underground way.
The poets leave hell.
"By which we left to contemplate the stars."
Monument to Dante in Trento, Italy.
"HIGHEST HONORS TO A POET"
